src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!
LEXICON kv6/h16
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 kv6 ;
 h16 ;
!
LEXICON kv6/h16e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 kv6 ;
 h16e ;
 !
LEXICON kv6 ! ár
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv6e    ;
  kv_flt6 ;
!
!LEXICON kv6e/h16e
! kv6e ;
! h16e ;
 !
LEXICON kv6_1
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv6_1e  ;
  kv_flt6 ;
!
LEXICON kv6e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem: S_F_SGNAD ;
 +N+Fem: S_F_SGGEN ;
!
LEXICON kv_flt6
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem: F_PLNA_AR ;
 +N+Fem: F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem: F_PLGEN   ;
!
LEXICON kv6_1e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem: S_F_SGNAD ;
 +N+Fem: S_N_SGG_s ;
!
LEXICON kv_OY
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** oy, oyggin
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:      FemObl_Flag ; !oy, oyggin
   +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:ggin  FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:      FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:nna   FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:      FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:%>nni FemObl_Flag ; ! oynni
       +N+Fem+Sg+Acc:      R           ; ! stem compound
              +N+Fem:      S_F_SGGEN   ;
                           kv_flt6     ;
!
LEXICON kv_OYGGJ
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** oyggj, oyggin
       +N+Fem+Sg+Nom:oyggj   DF_N_SGf_S  ; !
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:oyggj   FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:oynna   FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:oyggj   FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:%>oynni FemObl_Flag ; ! oynni
              +N+Fem:oyggj   S_F_SGGEN   ;
                    :oyggj   kv_flt6     ;
       +N+Fem+Sg+Gen:oyggjar R           ; ! stem compound
       +N+Fem+Pl+Gen:oyggja  R           ; ! stem compound
!
LEXICON kv7/3
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv7 ;
  kv3 ;
!
LEXICON kv7 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** vørr
  kv7e    ;
  kv_flt7 ;
!
LEXICON kv7e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem:      S_F_SGNAD ;
 +N+Fem:^OEA S_F_SGGEN ;
!
LEXICON kv_flt7
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem:^OEA F_PLNA_AR ;
 +N+Fem:      F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem:^OEA F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem:^OEA F_PLGEN   ;
!
LEXICON kv8 ! egg
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv8e    ;
  kv_flt8 ;
!
LEXICON kv8e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem:^JDEL S_F_SGNAD ;
 +N+Fem:       S_F_SGGEN ;
!
LEXICON kv_flt8
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem: F_PLNA_AR ;
 +N+Fem: F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem: F_PLGEN   ;
!
LEXICON kv9/2
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv9 ;
  kv2 ;
!
LEXICON kv9 ! strond
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv9e    ;
  kv_flt9 ;
!
LEXICON kv9_1 ! stong
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv9e      ;
  kv_flt9_1 ;
!
LEXICON kv9e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem:     S_F_SGNAD ;
 +N+Fem:^OA S_F_SGGEN ;
!
LEXICON kv_flt9
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem:^eIUML  F_PLNA_UR ;
 +N+Fem:        F_PLDAT   ; ! strondum
 +N+Fem:^OA     F_PLGEN   ;
!
LEXICON kv_flt9_1
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem:^eIUML  F_PLNA_UR ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:^eIUMLrinar FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:^eIUMLrinar FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem:        F_PLDAT   ; ! stongum
 +N+Fem:^eIUMLr F_PLDAT   ; ! stengrum, stengrunum
 +N+Fem:^OA     F_PLGEN   ;
!
LEXICON kv10 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** dorg
 +N+Fem:        S_F_SGNAD ;
 +N+Fem:        S_F_SGGEN ;
 +N+Fem:^eIUML  F_PLNA_UR ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def+Err/Orth:^IUMLrinar FemObl_Flag ; ! Sso
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:^eIUMLrinar FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem:        F_PLDAT   ; ! dorgum
 +N+Fem+Err/Orth:^eIUMLr F_PLDAT   ; ! dergrum, dergrunum, not Sso
 +N+Fem:        F_PLGEN   ;
 !
LEXICON kv11 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** song
  kv11e    ;
  kv_flt11 ;
!
LEXICON kv11e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom:song DF_N_SGf_S ; ! song, songin
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:seingin FemObl_Flag ; ! seingin

+N+Fem+Sg+Acc:song DF_A_SGf_S ; ! song, songina
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:seingina FemObl_Flag ; ! seingina

+N+Fem+Sg+Dat:song DF_D_SGf_S ; ! song, songini
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:seingini FemObl_Flag ; ! seingini

+N+Fem+Sg+Gen:songar DF_G_SGf_S ; ! songar, songarinnar
 +N+Fem+Sg+Gen:seingjar DF_G_SGf_S ; ! seingjar, seingjarinnar
 +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:songjar DF_G_SGf_S ; ! songjar, songjarinnar not in Sso
!
LEXICON kv_flt11
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:songir     DF_NA_PLf ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom:seingir    DF_NA_PLf ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom:sengur     DF_NA_PLf ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def+Err/Orth:sengrinar FemObl_Flag ; !not Sso
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def+Err/Orth:sengrinar FemObl_Flag ; !not Sso
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:songir     DF_NA_PLf ; !not Sso
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc:seingir    DF_NA_PLf ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc:sengur     DF_NA_PLf ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat:seingju    DF_D_PL ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Err/Orth:songju     DF_D_PL ; !not Sso
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Err/Orth:sengru     DF_D_PL ; ! sengrum, sengrunum
 +N+Fem+Pl+Gen:seingja    DF_G_PL ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:songja    DF_G_PL ;
!
LEXICON kv12 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** glóð
  kv12e    ;
  kv_flt12 ;
!
LEXICON kv12_1 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** bók
  kv12e    ;
  kv_flt12_1 ;
!
LEXICON kv12e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem: S_F_SGNAD ;
 +N+Fem: S_F_SGGEN ;
!
!LEXICON kv12f
!  kv_flt12 ;
!
LEXICON kv_flt12
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem:^IUML F_PLNA_UR ;
 +N+Fem:       F_PLDAT   ; ! glóðum
 +N+Fem:       F_PLGEN   ;
!
LEXICON kv_flt12_1
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem:^IUML F_PLNA_UR ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:^IUMLrinar FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:^IUMLrinar FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem:       F_PLDAT   ; ! bókum
 +N+Fem:^IUMLr F_PLDAT   ; ! bøkrum, bøkrunum
 +N+Fem:       F_PLGEN   ;
!
LEXICON kv13 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** mørk
  kv13e    ;
  kv_flt13 ;
!
LEXICON kv13e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom:mørk DF_N_SGf_S ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc:mørk DF_A_SGf_S ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat:mørk DF_D_SGf_S ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Gen:markar DF_G_SGf_S ;
!
LEXICON kv_flt13 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** Alternative way
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom:merkur DF_NA_PLf ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:merkrinar FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:merkrinar FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc:merkur DF_NA_PLf ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat:mørku DF_D_PL ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat:merkru DF_D_PL ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Gen:marka DF_G_PL ;
 !
LEXICON kv14 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** nátt
  kv14e    ;
  kv_flt14 ;
!
LEXICON kv14e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom:nátt DF_N_SGf_S ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc:nátt DF_A_SGf_S ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat:nátt DF_D_SGf_S ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Gen:náttar DF_G_SGf_S ;
!
LEXICON kv_flt14
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom:nætur DF_NA_PLf ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:nætrinar FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:nætrinar FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc:nætur DF_NA_PLf ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat:náttu DF_D_PL ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat:nætru DF_D_PL ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Gen:nátta DF_G_PL ;
!
LEXICON kv15 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** tonn
  kv15e    ;
  kv_flt15 ;
!
LEXICON kv15e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom:tonn DF_N_SGf_S ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc:tonn DF_A_SGf_S ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat:tonn DF_D_SGf_S ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Gen:tannar DF_G_SGf_S ;
!
LEXICON kv_flt15
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom:tenn DF_NA_PLf_inar ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc:tenn DF_NA_PLf_inar ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat:tonnu DF_D_PL ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Gen:tanna DF_G_PL ;
!
LEXICON kv16 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** mús, lús
 +N+Fem:       S_F_SGNAD   ;
 +N+Fem:       S_F_SGGEN   ;
 +N+Fem:^IUML F_PLNA_NULL ;
 +N+Fem:       F_PLDAT     ; ! músunum
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:^IUMLnum  ENDLEX ; ! mýsnum
 +N+Fem:       F_PLGEN     ;
!
LEXICON kv17 ! 
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** mastur
  kv17e    ;
  kv_flt17 ;
!
LEXICON kv17e
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:ur   FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:urin FemObl_Flag ; ! masturin
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:ur   FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:rina FemObl_Flag ; ! mastrina
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:ur   FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:rini FemObl_Flag ; ! mastrini
              +N+Fem:r    S_F_SGGEN ;
!
LEXICON kv_flt17
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Fem:r F_PLNA_AR ;
 +N+Fem:r F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem:r F_PLGEN   ;
!
LEXICON kv18/17
!! * **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
  kv18 ;
  kv17 ;
