src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Shortnouns
bót+CmpNP/None:bót kv12 ;
rók+CmpNP/None:rók kv12 ;
rót+CmpNP/None:rót kv12 ;
nævur+CmpNP/None:næv kv17e ;
LEXICON Nouns
upsadorg:upsa#dorg kv10 ;
runddorg:rund#dorg kv10 ;
dragdorg:drag#dorg kv10 ;
sleingidorg:sleingi#dorg kv10 ;
dragudorg:dragu#dorg kv10 ;
lokkudorg:lokku#dorg kv10 ;
rimasong:rima# kv11 ;
barnasong:barna# kv11 ;
brúðarsong:brúðar# kv11 ;
dragusong:dragu# kv11 ;
tvísong:tví# kv11 ;
fjallatrom:fjalla#trom kv9/2 ;
bergtrom:berg#trom kv9/2 ;
eggjartrom:eggjar#trom kv9/2 ;
undirtrom:undir#trom kv9/2 ;
bergstrom:bergs#trom kv9/2 ;
bryggjutrom:bryggju#trom kv9/2 ;
stálbrøkur:stálbrók kv_flt12_1 ;
undirbrøkur:undirbrók kv_flt12_1 ;
yvirbrøkur:yvirbrók kv_flt12_1 ;
oljubrøkur:oljubrók kv_flt12_1 ;
roðbrøkur:roðbrók kv_flt12_1 ;
eggrøtur:eggrót kv_flt12_1 ;
sparikassabók:spari#kassa#bók kv12_1 ;
telefonbók:tele#fon#bók kv12_1 ;
próvbók:próv#bók kv12_1 ;
lunnbót:lunn#bót kv12_1 ;
stólparót:stólpa#rót kv12_1 ;
orðrót:orð#rót kv12_1 ;
brandaglóð:branda#glóð kv12 ;
pípuglóð:pípu#glóð kv12 ;
fleyggj:fleyggj kv6/h16e ;
lundafleyggj:lunda#fleyggj kv6/h16e ;
groyggj:groyggj kv6/h16 ;
hjúnasong:hjúna# kv11 ;
hálvmørk:hálv# kv13 ;
egg:eggj kv8 ;
gágguskel:gággu#skelj kv8 ;
galtartonn:galtar# kv15 ;
hvanngørn:hvanngørn kv7 ;
grønertur:grønert kv17 ;
grunnlús:grunnlús kv16 ;
heimamús:heimamús kv16 ;
lepafit:lepa#fitj kv8 ;
krikkont:krikk#ont kv9 ;
hósnátt:hós# kv14 ;
oy+CmpNP/None:oy kv_OY ;
kamarmoy:kamar#moy kv_OY ;
fylgismoy:fylgis#moy kv_OY ;
vevmoy:vev#moy kv_OY ;
nánd:nánd kv6e ;
glóð:glóð kv12 ;
øksl:øksl kv7/3 ;
vegøksl:vegøksl kv7/3 ;
blaðøksl:blaðøksl kv7/3 ;
mørk: kv13 ;
skattamørk:skatta# kv13 ;
seyðamørk:seyða# kv13 ;
sandoyðimørk:sand#oyði# kv13 ;
uttangarðsmørk:uttan#garðs# kv13 ;
veturnætur:vetur# kv_flt14 ;
fríggjanátt:fríggja# kv14 ;
vindnátt:vind# kv14 ;
eystannátt:eystan# kv14 ;
veturnátt:vetur# kv14 ;
óveðursnátt:ó#veðurs# kv14 ;
fyljatenn:fylja# kv_flt15 ;
leysatenn:leysa# kv_flt15 ;
smettutenn:smettu# kv_flt15 ;
tvítenn:tví# kv_flt15 ;
vaksnamannatonn:vaksna#manna# kv15 ;
sagtonn:sag# kv15 ;
máltonn:mál# kv15 ;
eiturtonn:eitur# kv15 ;
handilstonn:handils# kv15 ;
fuglalús:fuglalús kv16 ;
veirlús:veirlús kv16 ;
flogmús:flogmús kv16 ;
friðartingingar:friðartinging kv_flt6 ;
uppstígingar:uppstíging kv_flt6 ;
verkingar:verking kv_flt6 ;
virkingar:virking kv_flt6 ;
snurringar:snurring kv_flt6 ;
bogageilar:bogageil kv_flt6 ;
gnígging:gnígging kv6 ;
slatrikelling:slatri#kelling kv6 ;
forrætning:for#rætning kv6_1 ;
innspræning:inn#spræning kv6 ;
blokering:blokering kv6_1 ;
elektrifisering:elektrifisering kv6_1 ;
alfabetisering:alfabetisering kv6_1 ;
polstring:polstring kv6_1 ;
tilvísing:til#vísing kv6 ;
panting:panting kv6_1 ;
træting:træting kv6 ;
dvørgamoyggj:dvørga#m kv_OYGGJ ;
brúðarmoyggj:brúðar#m kv_OYGGJ ;
suðurhavsoyggj:suður#havs# kv_OYGGJ ;
leypsrim:leypsrim kv6 ;
álvamoy:álva#moy kv_OY ;
festarmoy:festar#moy kv_OY ;
brúður:brúð kv18/17 ;
fjallabrúður:fjalla#brúð kv18/17 ;
sólbrúður:sól#brúð kv18/17 ;
yndisbrúður:yndis#brúð kv18/17 ;
mesanmastur:mesanmast kv17 ;
manstur:manst kv17 ;
sveitalivur:sveitaliv kv17 ;
royður:royð kv17 ;
bláragarnar:bláragarn kv_flt7 ;
blágarnar:blágarn kv_flt7 ;
siffanagarnar:siffanagarn kv_flt7 ;
gron:gron kv7 ;
viljagørn:viljagørn kv7 ;
blindgørn:blindgørn kv7 ;
spjørr:spjørr kv7 ;
vørr:vørr kv7 ;
bergsegg:bergs#eggj kv8 ;
vørpuskel:vørpu#skelj kv8 ;
útfit:út#fitj kv8 ;
læknahond:lækna#hond kv9_1 ;
leysarond:leysa#rond kv9_1 ;
vond:vond kv9 ;
fjaðurvond:fjaður#vond kv9 ;
liljuvond:lilju#vond kv9 ;
lærspong:lær#spong kv9_1 ;
skíggjastong:skíggja#stong kv9_1 ;
fleygistong:fleygi#stong kv9_1 ;
honk:honk kv9_1 ;
trøllont:trøll#ont kv9 ;
snælduont:snældu#ont kv9 ;
deyðasong:deyða# kv11e ;
sóttarsong:sóttar# kv11e ;
barsilssong:barsils# kv11e ;
siðabót:siða#bót kv12e ;
sálarbót:sálar#bót kv12e ;
súpanarbót:súpanar#bót kv12e ;
matarbót:matar#bót kv12e ;
trúarbót:trúar#bót kv12e ;
trúbót:trú#bót kv12e ;
midnátt:mid# kv14e ;
miðnátt:mið# kv14e ;
tíðartonn:tíðar# kv15e ;
fordøming:for#døming kv6_1e ;
avslapping:av#slapping kv6_1e ;
parkering:parkering kv6_1e ;
mekanisering:mekanisering kv6_1e ;
viðføring:við#føring kv6_1e ;
fresing:fresing kv6 ;
buljong:buljong kv6_1e ;
morgungron:morgungron kv7e ;
neyðsyn:neyð#synj kv8e ;
ravatenn:rava# kv_flt15 ;
filipsoyggj:filips kv_OYGGJ ;
hoyggj:h kv_OYGGJ ;
kyrrahavsoyggj:kyrrahavs kv_OYGGJ ;
